Wisconsin, session 2025, SB448.
do enact as follows:SB448,11Section 1. 885.60 (2) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:SB448,2,102885.60 (2) (d) If Except for an objection relating to the testimony of an expert 3witness by videoconference technology in a matter under ch. 51 or 55, if an objection 4is made by the defendant or respondent in a matter listed in sub. (1), regarding any 5proceeding where he or she is entitled to be physically present in the courtroom, the 6court shall sustain the objection. For all other proceedings in a matter listed in sub. 7(1), including an objection relating to the testimony of an expert witness by 8videoconference technology in a matter under ch. 51 or 55, the court shall 9determine the objection in the exercise of its discretion under the criteria set forth 10in s. 885.56.SB448,2,1111